Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.555

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Intent.

The legislature recognizes that quality in the state's public four-year institutions of higher education would be strengthened by additional partnerships between citizens and the institutions. The legislature intends to foster these partnerships by creating a matching grant program to assist public four-year institutions of higher education in creating endowments for funding distinguished professorships.

[ 1987 c 8 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.10.866.]

NOTES:

Allocation of appropriated moneys—1988 c 125; 1987 c 8: "(1) For the biennium ending June 30, 1989, all appropriations to the Washington distinguished professorship trust fund shall be allocated as provided in this section. The state treasurer shall reserve the following amounts in the trust fund for distribution to four-year higher education institutions at such time as qualifying gifts as defined in section 1, chapter 8, Laws of 1987 for distinguished professorships have been deposited:

(a) Two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars of the appropriation for the University of Washington;

(b) One million five hundred thousand dollars of the appropriation for Washington State University;

(c) One million dollars of the appropriation divided among Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College.

(2) Distribution of funds allocated in subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be made in the following manner: Eastern Washington University, Central Washington University, Western Washington University, and The Evergreen State College are guaranteed one professorship.

(3) As of January 1, 1989, if any funds reserved in subsection (1)(a) or (b) of this section have not been designated as matching funds for qualifying gifts, any four-year institution of higher education, which has already fully utilized the professorships allocated to it by this section, and, in the case of the regional universities and The Evergreen State College, has exhausted the allocation in subsection (1)(c) of this section, may be eligible for such funds under rules promulgated by the *higher education coordinating board." [ 1988 c 125 s 4; 1987 c 8 s 12.]

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.